Vermont, session 2025-2026, H765.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 7101 is amended to read:
§ 7101. DEFINITIONS
As used in this part of this title, the following words, unless the context
otherwise requires, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(13) “Mental health professional” means a person with professional
training, experience, and demonstrated competence in the treatment of mental
VT LEG #385529 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.765
2026 Page 2 of 6
illness, who shall be a physician, psychologist, social worker, mental health
counselor, nurse, or other qualified person designated by the Commissioner.
(14) “Mental illness” means a substantial disorder of thought, mood,
perception, orientation, or memory, any of which grossly impairs judgment,
behavior, capacity to recognize reality, or ability to meet the ordinary demands
of life, but shall not include intellectual disability.
(15)(14) “Patient” means a resident of or person in Vermont qualified
under this title for hospitalization or treatment as a person with a mental illness
or intellectual disability.
(16)(15) “A patient in need of further treatment” means:
* * *
(17)(16) “A person in need of treatment” means a person who has a
mental illness and, as a result of that mental illness, his or her capacity to
exercise self-control, judgment, or discretion in the conduct of his or her affairs
and social relations is so lessened that he or she poses a danger of harm to
himself, to herself, or to others:
* * *
(17) “Qualified mental health professional” means a person with
professional training, experience, and demonstrated competence in the
treatment of mental illness who has completed training to serve as a qualified
mental health professional as developed by the Commissioner in rule,
VT LEG #385529 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.765
2026 Page 3 of 6
including a professional who is not employed or under contract with a
designated or specialized service agency established pursuant to section 8907
or 8912 of this title, and who is an individual licensed or certified, respectively,
to provide mental health services as a physician pursuant to chapter 23 or 33 of
this title, an advance practice registered nurse specializing in psychiatric
mental health pursuant to chapter 28 of this title, a psychologist pursuant to
chapter 55 of this title, a social worker pursuant to chapter 61 of this title, a
clinical mental health counselor pursuant to chapter 65 of this title, a marriage
and family therapist pursuant to chapter 76 of this title, or a psychoanalyst
pursuant to chapter 77 of this title.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 7113 is amended to read:
§ 7113. INDEPENDENT EXAMINATION; PAYMENT
Whenever a court orders an independent examination by a qualified mental
health professional or a qualified developmental disabilities professional
pursuant to this title or 13 V.S.A. § 4822, the cost of the examination shall be
paid by the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or of
Mental Health. The qualified mental health professional or qualified
developmental disabilities professional may be selected by the court but the
Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or of Mental
VT LEG #385529 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.765
2026 Page 4 of 6
Health may adopt a reasonable fee schedule for examination, reports, and
testimony.
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 7505 is amended to read:
§ 7505. WARRANT AND CERTIFICATE FOR EMERGENCY
EXAMINATION
(a) In emergency circumstances where certification by a licensed physician
is not available without serious and unreasonable delay, and when personal
observation of the conduct of a person constitutes reasonable grounds to
believe that the person is a person in need of treatment, and the person presents
an immediate risk of serious injury to self or others if not restrained, a law
enforcement officer or qualified mental health professional may make an
application, not accompanied by a physician’s certificate, to any Superior
judge for a warrant for an emergency examination. The application shall be
based on facts personally observed by the qualified mental health professional
or the law enforcement officer or shall be supported by a statement of facts
under penalty of perjury by a person who personally observed the facts that
form the basis of the application.
(b)(1) The law enforcement officer may take the person into temporary
custody if the law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that the
person poses a risk of harm to self or others. The law enforcement officer or a
qualified mental health professional shall apply to the court for the warrant
VT LEG #385529 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.765
2026 Page 5 of 6
without delay while the person is in temporary custody. The law enforcement
officer, or a qualified mental health professional if clinically appropriate, may
then transport the person if the law enforcement officer or qualified mental
health professional conducting the transport has probable cause to believe that
the person poses a risk of harm to self or others.
* * *
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 7622 is amended to read:
§ 7622. EXPERT TESTIMONY
(a) A qualified mental health professional testifying at hearings conducted
under this part may, if appropriately qualified, give opinion testimony and,
notwithstanding 12 V.S.A. § 1612, describe any information that he or she the
qualified mental health professional acquired in attending the patient.
* * *
Sec. 5. 18 V.S.A. § 8008 is amended to read:
§ 8008. REVOCATION OF CONDITIONAL DISCHARGE
* * *
(b) A revocation by the Board or the head of the hospital shall authorize the
return of the patient to the hospital and shall be sufficient warrant for a law
enforcement officer or qualified mental health professional to take the patient
into custody and return him or her the patient to the hospital from which he or
she the patient was conditionally discharged.
VT LEG #385529 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.765
2026 Page 6 of 6
* * *
Sec. 6. 18 V.S.A. § 8350 is amended to read:
§ 8350. CONSENT BY MINORS FOR MENTAL HEALTH TREATMENT
A minor may give consent to receive any legally authorized outpatient
treatment from a qualified mental health professional, as defined in section
7101 of this title. Consent under this section shall not be subject to
disaffirmance due to minority of the person consenting. The consent of a
parent or legal guardian shall not be necessary to authorize outpatient
treatment. As used in this section, “outpatient treatment” means
psychotherapy and other counseling services that are supportive, but not
prescription drugs.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385529 v.2